src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-3lex_vyejettid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - vyejettiđ: # MLO checked
    vyejettiđ+V+Inf: vyejettiđ
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vyejettâm
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vyejettah
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vyejeet
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vyejetteen
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vyejeetvettee
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vyejettává
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vyejettep
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vyejeetvetteđ
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyejetteh
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vyejettim
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vyejettih
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vyejettij
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vyejettáim
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vyejettáid
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vyejettáin
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vyejettijm
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vyejettijd
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vyejettii
    vyejettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vyejettiččim
    vyejettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: vyejettiččih
    vyejettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vyejettičij
    vyejettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: vyejettiččijm
    vyejettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: vyejettiččijd
    vyejettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: vyejettiččijn
    vyejettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: vyejettiččijm
    vyejettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: vyejettiččijd
    vyejettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: vyejettiččii
    vyejettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: vyejettižžeem
    vyejettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: vyejettižžeeh
    vyejettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: vyejettiš
    vyejettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: vyejettižžeen
    vyejettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: vyejettišvettee
    vyejettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: vyejettižává
    vyejettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: vyejettižžep
    vyejettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: vyejettišvetteđ
    vyejettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: vyejettižeh

    vyejettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vyejeet
    vyejettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vyejettus
    vyejettiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: vyejettoon
    vyejettiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: vyejettee
    vyejettiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: vyejettus
    vyejettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vyejettop
    vyejettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vyejettiđ
    vyejettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vyejettus
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vyejeet
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vyejettâm
    vyejettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: vyejettiččii 
    vyejettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: vyejettižžii
    vyejettiđ+V+PrsPrc: [vyejetteijee, vyejettijjee]
    vyejettiđ+V+PrfPrc: vyejettâm
    vyejettiđ+V+Actio+Nom: vyejettem
    vyejettiđ+V+Actio+Ess: vyejeetmin
    vyejettiđ+V+Actio+Loc: vyejeetmist
    vyejettiđ+V+Actio+Ill: vyejeetmân
    vyejettiđ+V+Ger: vyejeetdijn
    vyejettiđ+V+VAbess: vyejeethánnáá
    

  Verb - anettiđ: # MLO checked
    anettiđ+V+Inf: anettiđ
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anettâm
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: anettah
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aaneet
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: anetteen
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: aaneetvettee
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: anettává
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: anettep
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aaneetvetteđ
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: anetteh
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: anettim
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: anettih
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: anettij
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: anettáim
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: anettáid
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: anettáin
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: anettijm
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: anettijd
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: anettii
    anettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: anettiččim
    anettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: anettiččih
    anettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: anettičij
    anettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: anettiččijm
    anettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: anettiččijd
    anettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: anettiččijn
    anettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: anettiččijm
    anettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: anettiččijd
    anettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: anettiččii
    anettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: anettižžeem
    anettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: anettižžeeh
    anettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: anettiš
    anettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: anettižžeen
    anettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: anettišvettee
    anettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: anettižává
    anettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: anettižžep
    anettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: anettišvetteđ
    anettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: anettižeh

    anettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: aaneet
    anettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: anettus
    anettiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: anettoon
    anettiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: anettee
    anettiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: anettus
    anettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: anettop
    anettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: anettiđ
    anettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: anettus
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: aaneet
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: anettâm
    anettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: anettiččii 
    anettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: anettižžii
    anettiđ+V+PrsPrc: [anetteijee, anettijjee]
    anettiđ+V+PrfPrc: anettâm
    anettiđ+V+Actio+Nom: anettem
    anettiđ+V+Actio+Ess: aaneetmin 
    anettiđ+V+Actio+Loc: aaneetmist
    anettiđ+V+Actio+Ill: aaneetmân
    anettiđ+V+Ger: aaneetdijn
    anettiđ+V+VAbess: aaneethánnáá
